Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1732YH (3) 91 dg/jh H.F. 406 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554I.1 Definitions. 1 1. âApplicationâ means a software program designed for an 2 electronic device to enable a user to perform a particular 3 task or set of related tasks including checking the weather, 4 playing games, accessing social media, or managing personal 5 information, within the capabilities of the electronic device. 6 2. âArtificial intelligenceâ means any machine-based system 7 that, for any explicit or implicit objective, infers from the 8 inputs the system receives to generate outputs, including 9 content, decisions, predictions, or recommendations, that can 10 influence physical or virtual environments. 11 3. âDeveloperâ means a person who, in this state, creates 12 or substantially modifies artificial intelligence or an 13 application that uses artificial intelligence. 14 4. a. âDevice companyâ means a person engaged in the 15 business of manufacturing smart devices and that has a 16 registered office, a registered agent, or a business office in 17 this state. 18 b. âDevice companyâ includes a registrant as defined in 19 section 548.101, that engages in the business of manufacturing 20 smart devices. 21 5. âInitializeâ means the process of starting a smart device 22 and associating the smart device with a new user account. 23 6. âPrivate dataâ means data that artificial intelligence, 24 or an application that includes artificial intelligence, 25 accesses on a smart device, and that is not any of the 26 following: 27 a. Content that was generated by using the artificial 28 intelligence or the application on the smart device. 29 b. Content to which the artificial intelligenceâs developer 30 or the applicationâs developer had previously received 31 authorization to access for purposes described in the smart 32 deviceâs statement of purpose or the applicationâs statement 33 of purpose. 34 7. âSmart deviceâ means a computer, smartphone, gaming 35 -1- LSB 1732YH (3) 91 dg/jh 1/ 10 H.F. 406 console, tablet computer, or other electronic device capable 1 of running software to download, install, or use artificial 2 intelligence and that was sold in this state on or after July 3 1, 2025. 4 8. âStatement of purposeâ means a statement made for an 5 application or smart device that explains all of the following: 6 a. The types of private data the application or smart device 7 was designed to access. 8 b. How the private data will be used, including but not 9 limited to the types of new content the private data will be 10 used to generate and how the new content will be used. 11 c. If the application or smart device is designed to save, 12 copy, or otherwise transfer private data to a location outside 13 the smart device, an explanation of how and where private data 14 will be maintained, disseminated, and deleted, as applicable. 15 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554I.2 Device company requirements. 16 1. a. If a device company makes a smart device available 17 for purchase with artificial intelligence installed on the 18 smart device, the device company shall cause an agreement to 19 appear when a user initializes the smart device. The agreement 20 shall contain all of the following: 21 (1) A notice to the smart deviceâs user that the smart 22 device has artificial intelligence installed on the smart 23 device. 24 (2) If the smart deviceâs artificial intelligence is 25 designed to access the userâs private data, the smart deviceâs 26 statement of purpose. 27 (3) (a) An option to uninstall the artificial intelligence. 28 (b) If the smart deviceâs user does not uninstall the 29 artificial intelligence under subparagraph division (a), an 30 interactive form that will allow the smart deviceâs user to 31 refuse the smart deviceâs artificial intelligence access to 32 each type of private data the artificial intelligence is 33 designed to access on the smart device prior to the artificial 34 intelligence accessing the private data. 35 -2- LSB 1732YH (3) 91 dg/jh 2/ 10 H.F. 406 b. The requirements of paragraph âaâ shall be separate from 1 any other agreement or disclaimer the device company requires 2 or is required to create for the smart device, including but 3 not limited to terms of service agreements and end user license 4 agreements. 5 2. If a device company changes any information contained in 6 the statement of purpose for a smart device, the device company 7 shall do all of the following: 8 a. Update the agreement described in subsection 1. 9 b. Cause the updated agreement described in subsection 1 to 10 appear on each smart device affected by the change and which 11 has not authorized or refused access to private data based on 12 the change. 13 3. If a device company causes a smart device the device 14 company manufactured to install artificial intelligence, the 15 device company shall not do any of the following: 16 a. Permit the artificial intelligence installed on the smart 17 device to access a type of private data that the artificial 18 intelligence was not authorized to access in an agreement 19 described in subsection 1. 20 b. Use private data accessed by the artificial intelligence 21 in a manner that is not stated in the smart deviceâs statement 22 of purpose. 23 c. If the artificial intelligence saves, copies, or 24 otherwise transfers private data to a location outside a smart 25 device from which the private data originated, maintain, 26 disseminate, or delete the private data in a manner that is 27 inconsistent with the smart deviceâs statement of purpose. 28 4. a. A device company shall not require a smart device 29 user to install artificial intelligence on the smart device as 30 a condition to use the smart device. 31 b. A device company shall include clearly identifiable means 32 to allow a user to uninstall artificial intelligence from a 33 smart device if the artificial intelligence was installed on 34 the smart device due to an action taken by the device company. 35 -3- LSB 1732YH (3) 91 dg/jh 3/ 10 H.F. 406 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 554I.3 Developer requirements. 1 1. a. If a developer makes an application that includes 2 artificial intelligence, makes the application available for 3 general use, and designs the application to access private 4 data, the developer shall cause an agreement to appear on 5 the initial start up of the application on the smart device 6 to which the application was installed. The agreement shall 7 contain all of the following: 8 (1) A notice to the applicationâs user that the application 9 includes artificial intelligence and the application is 10 designed to access private data. 11 (2) The applicationâs statement of purpose. 12 (3) An interactive form that will provide the applicationâs 13 user the ability to refuse the application access to each type 14 of private data the application is designed to access prior to 15 the application accessing the private data. 16 b. The requirements of paragraph âaâ shall be separate from 17 any other agreement or disclaimer the applicationâs developer 18 requires or is required to create for use of the application, 19 including but not limited to terms of service agreements and 20 end user license agreements. 21 2. If an applicationâs developer changes any information 22 contained in the applicationâs statement of purpose, the 23 applicationâs developer shall do all of the following: 24 a. Update the agreement described in subsection 1. 25 b. Cause the updated agreement described in subsection 1 to 26 appear on each smart device affected by the change which has 27 not authorized or refused access to private data based on the 28 change. 29 3. A developer of an application that includes artificial 30 intelligence shall not do any of the following: 31 a. Permit the application to access a type of private data 32 on a smart device that the application was not authorized to 33 access in an agreement described in subsection 1. 34 b. Use private data accessed by the application in a manner 35 -4- LSB 1732YH (3) 91 dg/jh 4/ 10 H.F. 406 that is not stated in the applicationâs statement of purpose. 1 c. If the application saves, copies, or otherwise transfers 2 private data to a location outside a smart device from which 3 the private data originated, maintain, disseminate, or delete 4 the private data in a manner that is inconsistent with the 5 applicationâs statement of purpose. 6 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 554I.4 Rights to likeness. 7 On or after July 1, 2025, a person shall not use artificial 8 intelligence to intentionally recreate the audio or visual 9 likeness of an individual without the consent of the 10 individual if the likeness was intended to be substantially 11 indistinguishable from the individual and the likeness is used 12 in any of the following ways: 13 1. Commercial activity. 14 2. A political campaign which the individual does not 15 support. 16 3. A manner intended to make other persons believe that 17 the individual engages in activities the individual would 18 reasonably find offensive. 19 4. A manner intended to diminish the individualâs 20 credibility, cause embarrassment, or otherwise lower the 21 individualâs esteem within the individualâs community. 22 5. A manner intended to induce a person to take an action or 23 divulge information the person otherwise would not. 24 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 554I.5 Civil liability ââ damages ââ 25 additional remedies. 26 1. A person may bring an action for actual and punitive 27 damages for a violation of this chapter, including reasonable 28 attorney fees and costs. Punitive damages shall not exceed two 29 hundred fifty thousand dollars for each violation. 30 2. A class action may be brought under this chapter in 31 accordance with the Iowa rules of civil procedure. 32 3. The court shall specify the amount of each of the 33 following for each violation of this chapter: 34 a. Actual damages. 35 -5- LSB 1732YH (3) 91 dg/jh 5/ 10 H.F. 406 b. Punitive damages. 1 c. Court costs. 2 d. Reasonable attorney fees. 3 4. In determining the punitive damages for a violation of 4 this chapter, the court shall consider all of the following: 5 a. The nature and extent of the violation. 6 b. The severity of the violation. 7 c. The potential economic effect of the punitive damages on 8 the person who violated this chapter. 9 d. The good-faith measures the person who violated this 10 chapter took to comply with this chapter. 11 e. The willfulness of the violation. 12 f. The deterrent effect that the imposition of punitive 13 damages will have. 14 g. Any other factors the court finds appropriate. 15 5. a. For purposes of imposing punitive damages under 16 this chapter, a device company is considered to have committed 17 a separate violation of section 554I.2 for each smart device 18 manufactured on or after July 1, 2025, that is initialized in 19 this state. 20 b. For purposes of imposing punitive damages under this 21 chapter, a developer shall be considered to have committed a 22 separate violation of section 554I.3 for each smart device that 23 uses the developerâs artificial intelligence or application on 24 or after July 1, 2025, in this state. 25 c. For purposes of imposing punitive damages under this 26 chapter, a person shall be considered to have committed a 27 separate violation of section 554I.4 for each day a violation 28 continues. 29 6. This chapter shall not preclude a person from bringing a 30 civil or criminal action under any other provision of law. 31